Louisiana, session 2026, SB407.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1276 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63,
64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87,
88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 117, 118,
119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134, 136,
138, 246, 247, 248, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H, 1-K, 2-K, 3-K,
4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K, 13-KA, 14-K,
15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 34-K, 35-K and 1-L of
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
Jefferson Parish; Lafourche Parish; Precincts 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-18, 3-19,
3-20, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23,
5-8, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 6-9, 7-17, 7-41, 7-42, 9-45,
9-45A, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12,
13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-1, 14-2, 14-3, 14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7, 14-8, 14-9,
14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-19, 14-20,
14-21, 14-25, 16-1, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 16-8, 17-1, 17-2, 17-3,
17-17, 17-18, 17-18A, 17-19 and 17-20 of Orleans Parish; Plaquemines Parish;
St. Bernard Parish; St. Mary Parish; Precincts 403, 408, 409, 412, 426, 603, 604,
606, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705, 706, 801, 802, 802A, 803, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808,
809, 810, 811, 812, 813, 814, 815, 815A, 816, 817, 818, 901, 902, 903, 903A, 904,
905, 906, 907, 908, 909, 909A, 910, 911, 913, 914, 915, 916, 917, 918, 921, 922,
M02, M04, M09, M09A, M10, P01, S01, S02, S03, S04, S05, S06, S07, S08, S09,
S10, S11, S13, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19, S21, S22, S23 and S24 of St. Tammany
Parish and Terrebonne Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 42, 44, 45, 47, 48,
50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 57, 65 and 66 of Ascension Parish; Assumption Parish;
Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-8, 3-2, 4-1, 4-2, 7-5, 8-2, 8-3, 9-1, 9-2, 9-4, 9-5, 10-1, 11-1,
11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-6, 12-1, 12-2 and 12-3 of Iberia Parish; Iberville Parish;
Precincts 104, 108, 115, 116, 131, 133, 150A, 150B, 151, 152, 153, 154, 155, 156,
157A, 170, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179A, 179B, 180, 181, 182, 183,
184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 189, 190, 191, 192, 193A, 193B, 194A, 194B, 195, 196,
197A, 197B, 198, 199, 200, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B,
213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231, 232A,
232B, 234, 235, 236, 237, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G,
9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 12-G, 13-G, 13-KB, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 30-K, 31-K,
33-K, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W, 6-W and 7-W of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2,
1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 6-1, 6-2,
6-4, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10, 7-11, 7-12, 7-13, 7-14,
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
7-15, 7-16, 7-18, 7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25, 7-25A, 7-26, 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28,
7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40, 8-1, 8-2, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8,
8-9, 8-12, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28,
8-30, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16,
9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A,
9-31B, 9-31D, 9-32, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35, 9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A,
9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A, 9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-42, 9-42C,
9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E, 9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L,
9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J,
9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44P, 9-44Q, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11,
10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13,
11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9, 12-10, 12-11, 12-12,
12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-26, 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5,
15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14,
15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A,
15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D,
15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B, 15-19C, 16-9, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8,
17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15 and 17-16 of Orleans
Parish; St. Charles Parish; St. James Parish; St. John the Baptist Parish and St.
Martin Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Acadia Parish; Allen Parish; Beauregard
Parish; Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish; Evangeline Parish; Precincts 1-7,
2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4,
8-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-4, 12-4, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 14-1, 14-3, 14-4 and 14-5
of Iberia Parish; Jefferson Davis Parish; Precincts 3, 8, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31,
32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 65, 66, 67, 69, 70,
71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93,
94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111,
114, 115, 116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, 130, 133, 134, 135
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
and 136 of Lafayette Parish; Precincts C22, C23, C31, C32, C33, C34, C35, C36,
C37-A, C37-B, C41, C42, N6, N7, N11, N12, N13-A, N13-B, N14-A, N14-B, N15,
N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19, N20, N21, N22, N23, N24, N25, N26, S1, S2, S4,
S5, S6A, S6B, S7, S8, S9, S10, S11, S13, S14, S21, S22, S23, S24, S25, S26, S27,
S28 and S29 of Rapides Parish; Vermilion Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-1A, 1-1B,
1-4, 1-5, 1-6A, 1-7, 1-7B, 1-8, 1-9, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-3A, 4-3B, 4-3C, 4-3G, 4-3K,
4-3L, 4-3N, 5-1, 5-2, 5-2A, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, 7-2, 7-2A, 7-2B, 7-3, 7-4, 7-4A,
7-5, 7-5A, 7-5D, 8-1, 8-2 and 8-3 of Vernon Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Bienville Parish; Bossier Parish; Caddo
Parish; Caldwell Parish; Claiborne Parish; De Soto Parish; Grant Parish;
Jackson Parish; La Salle Parish; Lincoln Parish; Natchitoches Parish; Precincts
1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7, 25, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 44A, 45, 46,
48, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 52, 52A, 53, 54, 55, 56, 56A, 57, 58, 61, 64, 71, 75, 76, 77 and
78 of Ouachita Parish; Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; Union Parish;
Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-3C, 1-4B, 1-4C, 1-5A, 1-6, 1-6B, 1-8A, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-2A,
2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4 and 3-5 of Vernon Parish; Webster Parish and Winn
Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Avoyelles Parish; Catahoula Parish;
Concordia Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13,
1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28,
1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-33, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-45, 1-50, 1-51, 1-52, 1-53, 1-54,
1-55, 1-57, 1-58, 1-60, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-70, 1-71, 1-72, 1-74, 1-77, 1-78,
1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-96,
1-97, 1-100, 1-101, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12,
2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26,
2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31, 2-32, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-24, 3-28, 3-32,
3-42, 3-54 and 3-72 of East Baton Rouge Parish; East Carroll Parish; East
Feliciana Parish; Franklin Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14,
15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 63, 64,
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
68, 112, 113, 122 and 123 of Lafayette Parish; Madison Parish; Morehouse
Parish; Precincts 3, 5, 8, 9, 9A, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23,
24, 26, 27, 28, 30, 47, 59, 60, 62, 63, 65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74 and 79
of Ouachita Parish; Pointe Coupee Parish; Precincts C1, C2, C3, C4, C5, C6,
C7, C8, C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13, C14, C15, C17, C18, C19, C20, C21, C24,
C25, C26, C27, C28, C30, C38-A, C38-B, C39, C40, N1, N2, N3, N4, N5, N8, N9,
N10, N27, N28, N29, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19 and S20 of Rapides Parish;
Richland Parish; St. Helena Parish; St. Landry Parish; Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16,
17, 28, 101, 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 109, 111A and 115B of Tangipahoa
Parish; Tensas Parish; West Baton Rouge Parish; West Carroll Parish and
West Feliciana Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 41, 43,
58, 61, 62, 63, 64, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 76, 77 and 78 of Ascension Parish; Precincts
1-8, 1-12, 1-34, 1-35, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-46, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-56,
1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-73, 1-75, 1-76, 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-98, 1-99,
1-102, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9,
3-10, 3-11, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23,
3-25, 3-26, 3-27, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37, 3-38, 3-39, 3-40,
3-41, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53, 3-55, 3-56,
3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70,
3-71, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75 and 3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish; Livingston Parish;
Precincts 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114,
115, 116, 118, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206, 207, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307,
308, 309, 310, 312, 312A, 313, 314, 401, 402, 404, 405, 406, 407, 410, 411, 413,
414, 415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 420, 421, 422, 427, 429, 430, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505,
602, 605, 609, A01, A02, A02A, A03, A04, C01, C02, C03, C04, C06, C07, C08,
C09, C11, F01, M01, M06, M07, M08, M11, M12 and MD1 of St. Tammany
Parish; Precincts 33, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 49, 70, 70A, 71, 72,
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
72A, 73, 74, 110, 112, 114, 116, 117, 118, 118A, 119, 120, 120A, 120B, 121, 121A,
122A, 122B, 122C, 123, 124, 125, 127, 129A, 133, 133A, 137, 137A, 137B, 137C,
137D, 139, 141, 141A, 143, 143A, 145, 147, 149, 149A and 151 of Tangipahoa
Parish and Washington Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 18:1276.1 is hereby repealed.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any person
holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the appointment
or election is based upon a congressional district as composed pursuant to R.S. 18:1276.1.
Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a congressional
district and that is to be filled after January 3, 2029, shall be appointed or elected from a
district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-789 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 407
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the United States Congress at the regularly scheduled
election for representatives to the congress in 2028, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the United States Congress and for
all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at noon on
January 3, 2029.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at noon on January
3, 2029.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.